lexc/noun/enhuoa.lexc
LEXICON Gen21
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case20;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case20;
                       Case21;
 
LEXICON Case20
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t      #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Case21
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^at    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


LEXICON AddNountej
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Casetej;

LEXICON Casetej
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t

LEXICON AddNounszaj
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possszaj;

LEXICON Possszaj
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Genszaj;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Genszaj;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Genszaj;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Genszaj;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Genszaj;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Genszaj;   ! ük, uk
!+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Genszaj;   ! aim
!+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Genszaj;   ! aid
!+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Genszaj;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
!+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Genszaj;   ! aink, eink
!+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Genszaj;  ! aitok, eitek
!+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Genszaj;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                           Caseszaj;
       
!LEXICON Famszaj
!+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genszaj;
!                       Genszaj;

LEXICON Genszaj
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Caseszaj;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseszaj;
                       Caseszaj;
 
LEXICON Caseszaj
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t      #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounjnull
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possjnull;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possjnull
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounolaj
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possolaj;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurolaj;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possolaj
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plurolaj
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen; !olajak
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;  !olajok
                            Gen;

LEXICON AddNounnyugtot
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0 CaseNounnyugtot;

LEXICON CaseNounnyugtot
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t

LEXICON Noun
acélnyersvas AddNountej;
agyagszáj:agyagszá AddNounszaj;
aknaszáj:aknaszá AddNounszaj;
alakvas AddNountej;
alátétvas AddNountej;
anyaszáj:anyaszá AddNounszaj;
aranyolaj AddNounolaj;
aranyszáj:aranyszá AddNounszaj;
asszonyszáj:asszonyszá AddNounszaj;
autóolaj AddNounolaj;
balzsamolaj AddNounolaj;
barlangszáj:barlangszá AddNounszaj;
bazsalikomolaj AddNounolaj;
behúzóvas AddNountej;
bilivas AddNountej;
bohócszáj:bohócszá AddNounszaj;
borjúszáj:borjúszá AddNounszaj;
borsmentaolaj AddNounolaj;
borókaolaj AddNounolaj;
boszorkányszáj:boszorkányszá AddNounszaj;
bozótvas AddNountej;
bálnaolaj AddNounolaj;
bálnaszáj:bálnaszá AddNounszaj;
bányavas AddNountej;
bélszáj:bélszá AddNounszaj;
bélyegvas AddNountej;
bükkmakkolaj AddNounolaj;
cethalszáj:cethalszá AddNounszaj;
cickafarkolaj AddNounolaj;
citromhéjolaj AddNounolaj;
combvas AddNountej;
csapszáj:csapszá AddNounszaj;
csatlóvas AddNountej;
csatornaszáj:csatornaszá AddNounszaj;
csecsemőszáj:csecsemőszá AddNounszaj;
cselédszáj:cselédszá AddNounszaj;
cseresznyeszáj:cseresznyeszá AddNounszaj;
csokiszáj:csokiszá AddNounszaj;
csomborolaj AddNounolaj;
csukaszáj:csukaszá AddNounszaj;
csúcsvas AddNountej;
cápamájolaj AddNounolaj;
cápaszáj:cápaszá AddNounszaj;
cériumvas AddNountej;
difiolaj AddNounolaj;
diákszáj:diákszá AddNounszaj;
dobhas AddNountej;
dárdavas AddNountej;
dízelgázolaj AddNounolaj;
ecetvas AddNountej;
edzőolaj AddNounolaj;
edényszáj:edényszá AddNounszaj;
eperszáj:eperszá AddNounszaj;
esszenciaolaj AddNounolaj;
esztergavas AddNountej;
fakátrányolaj AddNounolaj;
faluszáj:faluszá AddNounszaj;
farokvas AddNountej;
faunszáj:faunszá AddNounszaj;
felesvas AddNountej;
fenyőkátrányolaj AddNounolaj;
fenőolaj AddNounolaj;
foghúzóvas AddNountej;
fogyt AddNounjnull; !elfogyta
fokhagymaolaj AddNounolaj;
folyószáj:folyószá AddNounszaj;
fordítóvas AddNountej;
fugavas AddNountej;
fékolaj AddNounolaj;
félszáj:félszá AddNounszaj;
félvas AddNountej;
férfiszáj:férfiszá AddNounszaj;
fúróolaj AddNounolaj;
függesztővas AddNountej;
főzőolaj AddNounolaj;
fűtőolaj AddNounolaj;
gerelyvas AddNountej;
grapefruitolaj AddNounolaj;
gumihas AddNountej;
gyapotmagolaj AddNounolaj;
gyerekszáj:gyerekszá AddNounszaj;
gyertyavas AddNountej;
gyógyszerolaj AddNounolaj;
gyümölcsolaj AddNounolaj;
gépkenőolaj AddNounolaj;
hajdinaolaj AddNounolaj;
hajtóvas AddNountej;
halszáj:halszá AddNounszaj;
has AddNountej;
hengerolaj AddNounolaj;
holt AddNounjnull; ! holtáig
hordószáj:hordószá AddNounszaj;
hosszvas AddNountej;
hurokvas AddNountej;
hántolóvas AddNountej;
hódvas AddNountej;
húzóolaj AddNounolaj;
hüvelyszáj:hüvelyszá AddNounszaj;
izomhas AddNountej;
játékvas AddNountej;
jázminolaj AddNounolaj;
kancsószáj:kancsószá AddNounszaj;
kandallóvas AddNountej;
kapocsvas AddNountej;
kazánfűtőolaj AddNounolaj;
kecskehas AddNountej;
kemenceszáj:kemenceszá AddNounszaj;
keverékolaj AddNounolaj;
kismamaszáj:kismamaszá AddNounszaj;
koldusszáj:koldusszá AddNounszaj;
kontyvas AddNountej;
kovácsvas AddNountej;
krokodilusszáj:krokodilusszá AddNounszaj;
krotonolaj AddNounolaj;
kulacsszáj:kulacsszá AddNounszaj;
kályhaszáj:kályhaszá AddNounszaj;
kókuszétolaj AddNounolaj;
körszáj:körszá AddNounszaj;
körvas AddNountej;
köszörűolaj AddNounolaj;
kútszáj:kútszá AddNounszaj;
lapvas AddNountej;
levélolaj AddNounolaj;
leányszáj:leányszá AddNounszaj;
lábtörlővas AddNountej;
lángszóróolaj AddNounolaj;
macskaszáj:macskaszá AddNounszaj;
magasvas AddNountej;
masszírozóolaj AddNounolaj;
medveszáj:medveszá AddNounszaj;
merevítővas AddNountej;
motorolaj AddNounolaj;
mécsolaj AddNounolaj;
méhnyakszáj:méhnyakszá AddNounszaj;
mókushas AddNountej;
múlt AddNounjnull; !elmúlta
műszáj:műszá AddNounszaj;
napraforgóolaj AddNounolaj;
nyeregvas AddNountej;
nyersolaj AddNounolaj;
nyugt AddNounjnull; !lenyugta
nyugt AddNounnyugtot; 
népszáj:népszá AddNounszaj;
orbáncfűolaj AddNounolaj;
oromvas AddNountej;
paraffinolaj AddNounolaj;
pinceszáj:pinceszá AddNounszaj;
piszkavas AddNountej;
pokolszáj:pokolszá AddNounszaj;
proliszáj:proliszá AddNounszaj;
préslégszerszámolaj AddNounolaj;
pézsmaolaj AddNounolaj;
pókhas AddNountej;
rezgővas AddNountej;
ricinusolaj AddNounolaj;
rézvas AddNountej;
rózsafaolaj AddNounolaj;
rózsaszáj:rózsaszá AddNounszaj;
siklóvas AddNountej;
skorpióolaj AddNounolaj;
szegfűolaj AddNounolaj;
szegvas AddNountej;
szolgavas AddNountej;
szolárolaj AddNounolaj;
szurdokszáj:szurdokszá AddNounszaj;
színészszáj:színészszá AddNounszaj;
szögletvas AddNountej;
szőlőmagolaj AddNounolaj;
sárkányszáj:sárkányszá AddNounszaj;
sörhas AddNountej;
taszítóvas AddNountej;
teaolaj AddNounolaj;
tehénszáj:tehénszá AddNounszaj;
tigrisszáj:tigrisszá AddNounszaj;
tojásolaj AddNounolaj;
tolóvas AddNountej;
táblaolaj AddNounolaj;
tárószáj:tárószá AddNounszaj;
tömbvas AddNountej;
törökvörösolaj AddNounolaj;
tüzesvas AddNountej;
varrógépszáj:varrógépszá AddNounszaj;
vastagolaj AddNounolaj;
verővas AddNountej;
vitriololaj AddNounolaj;
vonalszáj:vonalszá AddNounszaj;
vágóvas AddNountej;
víznyelőszáj:víznyelőszá AddNounszaj;
zsaluzóolaj AddNounolaj;
zsombolyszáj:zsombolyszá AddNounszaj;
zárvas AddNountej;
állt AddNounjnull; !megállta
áttételolaj AddNounolaj;
ócskavas AddNountej;
ökörszáj:ökörszá AddNounszaj;
ördögszáj:ördögszá AddNounszaj;
örömolaj AddNounolaj;
üstszáj:üstszá AddNounszaj;
ütközővas AddNountej;
ősszáj:ősszá AddNounszaj;
